Oklahoma, session 2025, SB485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 14-110, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 14-110. When a municipality has compiled and published


its permanent volume or biennial supplement of penal ordinances, the


governing body of the municipality shall adopt a resolution


notifying the public of the publication. A copy of the resolution


shall be filed in the office of the county clerk in each county in


which the municipality is located. The county clerk shall assign


the filed resolution a book and page number. At least one copy of


the permanent volume and each biennial supplement shall be deposited


free of cost by the municipality in the county law library of each


county wherein the municipality is located, and receipt of same

Req. No. 1003 Page 1


shall be duly noted in writing by the county law librarian. A copy


of the receipt may be filed with the county clerk who shall then


assign a book and page number. The permanent volume or biennial


supplement of compiled penal ordinances shall be available for


purchase by the public at a reasonable price. Ordinances which have


been compiled and filed in accordance with this section shall be


judicially noticed in all court proceedings. Provided, a court may


consider a book and page reference of the county clerk’s filings as


satisfactory proof of compliance so that judicial notice may be


taken of an ordinance.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1003 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:37:19 AM























Req. No. 1003 Page 2